Nebraska, session 109, LB676.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB676 LB676
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 38-206, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-206 The board shall:
(1) Establish standards for integrated practice agreements between
collaborating physicians and certified nurse midwives;
(1) (2) Monitor the scope of practice by certified nurse midwives,
certified registered nurse anesthetists, clinical nurse specialists, and
nurse practitioners;
(2) (3) Recommend disciplinary action relating to licenses of
advanced practice registered nurses, certified nurse midwives, certified
registered nurse anesthetists, clinical nurse specialists, and nurse
practitioners;
(3) (4) Engage in other activities not inconsistent with the
Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act, the Certified Nurse
Midwifery Practice Act, the Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist
Practice Act, the Clinical Nurse Specialist Practice Act, and the Nurse
Practitioner Practice Act; and
(4) (5) Adopt rules and regulations to implement the Advanced
Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act, the Certified Nurse Midwifery
Practice Act, the Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist Practice Act,
the Clinical Nurse Specialist Practice Act, and the Nurse Practitioner
Practice Act, for promulgation by the department as provided in section
38-126. Such rules and regulations shall also include: (a) Approved
certification organizations and approved certification programs; and (b)
professional liability insurance.
Sec. 2. Section 38-601, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-601 Sections 38-601 to 38-618 and section 7 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice Act.
Sec. 3. Section 38-603, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-2-

LB676 LB676
2025 2025
38-603 For purposes of the Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice Act
and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context
otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-605 38-604 to
38-610 and section 7 of this act apply.
Sec. 4. Section 38-604, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-604 Approved certified nurse midwifery education program means a
certified nurse midwifery education program approved by the board. The
board may require such program to be accredited by the Accreditation
Commission for Midwifery Education American College of Nurse-Midwives.
Sec. 5. Section 38-606, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-606 Certified nurse midwife means a person certified by a board-
approved certifying body and licensed under the Advanced Practice
Registered Nurse Practice Act to practice certified nurse midwifery in
the State of Nebraska. Nothing in the Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice
Act is intended to restrict the practice of other health care providers
registered nurses.
Sec. 6. Section 38-607, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-607 Collaboration means a process and relationship in which a
certified nurse midwife works together with other health care providers
professionals to deliver health care within the scope of practice of
certified nurse midwifery as provided in the Certified Nurse Midwifery
Practice Act. The collaborative relationship between the physician and
the nurse midwife shall be subject to the control and regulation of the
board.
Sec. 7. Consultation means a process whereby a certified nurse
midwife seeks the advice or opinion of a physician or another health care
provider.
Sec. 8. Section 38-608, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-3-

LB676 LB676
2025 2025
amended to read:
38-608 Health care provider means a health care professional
licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act.
Licensed practitioner means any physician licensed to practice
pursuant to the Medicine and Surgery Practice Act, whose practice
includes obstetrics.
Sec. 9. Section 38-610, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-610 Referral means a process whereby a certified nurse midwife
directs the patient to a physician or other health care provider for
management of a particular problem or aspect of the patient's care.
Supervision means the ready availability of a collaborating licensed
practitioner for consultation and direction of the activities of the
certified nurse midwife related to delegated medical functions as
outlined in the practice agreement.
Sec. 10. Section 38-611, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-611 (1) A certified nurse midwife may provide health care
services within the midwife's specialty area. A certified nurse midwife
shall function by establishing collaborative, consultative, and referral
networks as appropriate with other health care professionals. A certified
nurse midwife shall refer a patient who requires care beyond the scope of
practice of the certified nurse midwife to an appropriate health care
provider.
(2) The practice of a certified nurse midwife may include, but is
not limited to:
(a) Providing preconception, prenatal, intrapartum, and postpartum
care;
(b) Providing gynecological services;
(c) Providing primary care for females;
(d) Providing care for a newborn immediately following birth through
-4-

LB676 LB676
2025 2025
twenty-eight days of age;
(e) Assessing patients, ordering diagnostic tests and therapeutic
treatments, synthesizing and analyzing data, and applying advanced
nursing principles;
(f) Dispensing sample medications that are provided by the
manufacturer and are provided at no charge to the patient;
(g) Prescribing therapeutic measures and medications relating to
health conditions within the scope of practice of a certified nurse
midwife; and
(h) Pronouncing death and completing and signing a death certificate
and any other form if such activities are within the scope of practice of
the certified nurse midwife and are not otherwise prohibited by law.
A certified nurse midwife may, under the provisions of a practice
agreement, (1) attend cases of normal childbirth, (2) provide prenatal,
intrapartum, and postpartum care, (3) provide normal obstetrical and
gynecological services for women, and (4) provide care for the newborn
immediately following birth. The conditions under which a certified nurse
midwife is required to refer cases to a collaborating licensed
practitioner shall be specified in the practice agreement.
Sec. 11. Section 44-2803, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
44-2803 Health care provider means: (1) A physician; (2) a certified
registered nurse anesthetist; (3) a certified nurse midwife; (4) an
individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation,
association, facility, institution, or other entity authorized by law to
provide professional medical services by physicians, or certified
registered nurse anesthetists, or certified nurse midwives; (5) (4) a
hospital; or (6) (5) a personal representative as defined in section
30-2209 who is successor or assignee of any health care provider
designated in subdivisions (1) through (5) (4) of this section.
Sec. 12. Original sections 38-206, 38-601, 38-603, 38-604, 38-606,
-5-

LB676 LB676
2025 2025
38-607, 38-608, 38-610, 38-611, and 44-2803, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 13. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
38-609, 38-613, and 38-614, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-6-